Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-533
Attachment and execution issued from another county; sheriff file notice.

No levy of attachment or execution on real estate issued from any other county shall be notice to a subsequent vendee or encumbrancer in good faith, unless the sheriff has filed a notice on the record that the land, describing it, has been so attached or levied on, the cause in which it was so attached, and when it was done.

Laws 1895, c. 73, § 2, p. 314;

R.S.1913, § 7653;

C.S.1922, § 8597;

C.S.1929, § 20-533;

R.S.1943, § 25-533;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 8.